Wisconsin, session 2025, AB385.
do enact as follows:AB385,1Section 1. 11.0103 (6) of the statutes is created to read:11.0103 (6) Online credit card contributions. (a) 1. Any 3rd-party group that solicits and accepts money via the Internet by credit card or debit card to make contributions to a committee or conduit, at the time of making the transaction, shall obtain a billing address located in the United States, except as provided in par. (b).2. Any 3rd-party group that solicits and accepts money via the Internet by credit card or debit card to make contributions to a committee or conduit shall ensure that the credit card or debit card verification value or code is required and verified at the time the contribution is made and shall verify that the billing address associated with the credit card is located in the United States, except as provided in par. (b).(b) If the contribution under par. (a) is made by a U.S. citizen living outside of the United States, and the credit card or debit card billing address is not located in the United States, the 3rd-party group that solicits and accepts money via the Internet by credit card or debit card to make contributions to a committee or conduit shall obtain the mailing address of the location in the United States that the individual making the contribution uses for voter registration purposes and provide that address to the committee or conduit.(c) Any 3rd-party group that solicits and accepts money via the Internet by credit card or debit card to make contributions to a committee or conduit without requiring the credit card or debit card verification value or code or address as provided under this subsection is subject to a forfeiture in an amount equal to the cumulative amount of such contributions. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab385 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab385 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB385 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB385 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB385: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting